Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-307
Joint facilities; bonds; authority of county board; eminent domain; powers.

If a majority of the electors voting thereon vote in favor of such question or questions submitted, such county board shall proceed accordingly.

To acquire property for the purposes set forth in section 13-304, each county shall have the power of eminent domain which shall be exercised by the county board of each county in the manner provided in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1971, LB 557, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-823.